Hawaii statutes.
§171-117 Public lands; agricultural park
lands. (a) Public lands may be used for agricultural parks under this
part.

(b) Public lands designated or in use as
agricultural parks on June 30, 1986, may be set aside under section 171-11
to the department of agriculture upon its request for use as agriculture
parks. Notwithstanding any lease term to the contrary, after June 30,
1986, revenues from the rent, use, or maintenance of leased lots in
agricultural parks set aside under this subsection shall be deposited into the
agricultural park special fund established under section 166-10. [L 1974, c
231, pt of §3(2); am L 1986, c 222, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next